Utah statutes.
79-4-603.   Iron Mission Historical Monument -- Acceptance of gifts from
Iron Mission Park Corporation.
The board shall accept on behalf of the state the Gronway Parry collection of
horse-drawn vehicles, horses, harnesses, figures, costumes, and horse-drawn
machinery of the pioneer era, the Melling log cabin, the Osborne blacksmith
collection, and a metal exhibit building, all being gifts to the state from
the Iron Mission Park Nonprofit Corporation.
